California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Such ownership or control is hereby declared to be contrary to public policy, as tending to create a monopoly and to interfere with trade and commerce.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Warranties [18501. - 18502.]

18501.

In the absence of an express warranty, the mere sale of livestock shall not be construed to imply a warranty of such livestock for any particular purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

18502.

In the absence of any express warranty, the sale of livestock for slaughter, whether the slaughter will be immediate or otherwise, shall not imply a warranty of fitness for any particular purpose or warranty of merchantable quality, notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1), (2), and (5) of Section 1735 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Meat and Poultry Inspection [18650. - 18935.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and Short Title [18650. - 18677.]

18650.

This chapter shall be known as the California Meat and Poultry Inspection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18651.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18652.

“Adulterated” means any livestock product or poultry product which is in violation of Article 4 (commencing with Section 18751) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18653.

“Animal food manufacturer” means any person that is engaged in the business of preparing any animal food which is derived wholly or in part from any livestock or poultry carcass or any part or product of any such carcass.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18654.

“Broker” means any person that is engaged in the business of buying or selling any livestock product or poultry product on commission, or otherwise negotiating any purchase or sale of any livestock product or poultry product, other than for his own account or as an employee of another person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18655.

“Capable of use as human food” means any livestock or poultry carcass, or any part or product of any such carcass, unless it is denatured or otherwise identified as required by the director to prevent its use as human food, or is naturally inedible by humans.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18656.

“Container” or “package” means any box, can, tin, cloth, plastic, or other receptacle, wrapper, or cover.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18657.

“Federal acts” means the Federal Meat Inspection Act and Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18658.

“Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act” means the act so entitled, approved June 25, 1938 (52 Stat. 1040; 21 U.S.C., Sec. 301 et seq.), and acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18659.

“Federal Meat Inspection Act” means the act so entitled approved March 4, 1907 (34 Stat. 1260; 21 U.S.C., Sec. 71 et seq.), as amended by the Wholesome Meat Act (81 Stat. 584; 21 U.S.C., Sec. 601 et seq.).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18660.

“Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act” means the act so entitled approved August 28, 1957 (71 Stat. 441; 21 U.S.C., Sec. 451 et seq.), as amended by the Wholesome Poultry Products Act (82 Stat. 791; 21 U.S.C., Sec. 451 et seq. ).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18661.

“Inspector” means an employee of the department authorized to perform any inspection function under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18662.

“Label” means a display of written, printed, or graphic matter upon any article or the immediate container of any article. It does not, however, include package liners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18663.

“Livestock” means any cattle, sheep, swine, goat, or any horse, mule or other equine, whether live or dead.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18664.

“Livestock product” means any carcass, part of a carcass, meat, or meat food product of any livestock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18665.

“Meat food product” means any product which is capable of use as human food that is made wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any cattle, sheep, swine, or goat. The director may exempt from this definition any product which contains meat or any other portion of such a carcass only in a relatively small proportion which is found by the director not to be a product of the meat food industry for the purposes of this chapter, under such conditions as he may prescribe to assure that the meat or other portion of such carcass which is contained in such product is not adulterated and that such product is not represented as a meat food product. The term meat food product, as applied to any food product of any equine, has the same meaning as is provided in this paragraph with respect to meat food products of cattle, sheep, swine, and goats.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18666.

“Misbranded” means any livestock product or poultry product which is in violation of Article 5 (commencing with Section 18781) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18667.

“Official certificate” means any certificate which is prescribed by regulations of the director for issuance by an inspector or other person performing official functions under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18668.

“Official device” means any device which is prescribed or authorized by the director for use in applying any official mark.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18669.

“Official establishment” means any establishment at which inspection of the slaughter of livestock or poultry, or the preparation of any livestock product or poultry product, is maintained under the authority of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18670.

“Official inspection legend” means any symbol which is prescribed by the director that shows that an article was inspected and passed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18671.

“Offical mark” means the official inspection legend or any other symbol which is prescribed by the director to identify the status of any article or livestock or poultry under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18672.

“Person” includes any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other business unit, and any officer, agent, or employee thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18673.

“Pesticide chemical,” “food additive,” “color additive,” and “raw agricultural commodity” shall have the same meanings as under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18674.

“Prepared” means slaughtered, canned, salted, stuffed, rendered, boned, cut up, or otherwise manufactured or processed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18675.

“Poultry” means any domesticated bird, whether live or dead.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18676.

“Poultry product” means any poultry carcass, any part of a poultry carcass, or any product which is made wholly or in part from any poultry carcass or any part of a poultry carcass. The director may exempt from this definition any product which contains any poultry ingredient only in a relatively small proportion which is found by him not to be a product of the poultry food industry for the purposes of this chapter, under such condition as he may prescribe to assure that the poultry ingredient in such product is not adulterated and that such product is not represented as a poultry product.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18677.

“Renderer” means any person that is engaged in the business of rendering any livestock or poultry carcass, or any part or product of such a carcass, except rendering conducted under inspection or exemption under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [18691. - 18697.]

18691.

Meat, meat food products, poultry, and poultry products are an important source of the nation’s total supply of food. It is essential in the public interest that the health and welfare of consumers be protected by assuring that meat, meat food products, slaughtered poultry, and poultry products, distributed to them are wholesome, not adulterated, and properly marked, labeled, and packaged. Unwholesome, adulterated, or misbranded meat, meat food products, poultry, or poultry products, are injurious to the public welfare, destroy markets for wholesome, not adulterated and properly labeled and packaged meat, meat food products, poultry, and poultry products, and result in sundry losses to livestock and poultry producers and processors of meat, meat food products, poultry, and poultry products, as well as injury to consumers. Unwholesome, adulterated, mislabeled, or deceptive packaged articles can be sold at lower prices and compete unfairly with wholesome, not adulterated, and properly labeled and packaged articles, to the detriment of consumers and the public generally. It is hereby found that regulation by the director and cooperation by this state and the United States as contemplated by this chapter are appropriate to protect the health and welfare of consumers and otherwise effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18692.

It is the objective of this chapter to provide for meat and poultry products inspection programs that will impose and enforce requirements with respect to intrastate operations and commerce that are at least equal to those imposed and enforced under the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act with respect to operations and transactions in interstate commerce. The director shall administer this chapter so as to accomplish this purpose. The Department of Agriculture is designated as the appropriate state agency to cooperate with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States in administration this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18693.

The regulations which are adopted pursuant to this chapter shall conform, so far as possible, to the rules, regulations, and standards of the United States Department of Agriculture which govern the inspection, preparation, and processing of livestock and livestock products and poultry and poultry products.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the director may adopt, by regulation, standards and requirements equal to those of the federal acts, including, but not limited to, standards and requirements of inspection, sanitation, reinspection, preparation, processing, buying, selling, transporting, storing, identification, recordkeeping, registration, and labeling. The regulations shall not be less restrictive than state statutory requirements. The director may enter into cooperative agreements with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States to enforce such standards and requirements in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18694.

This chapter applies to any person, establishment, animal, or article regulated under the federal acts only to the extent provided for in the federal acts. The exemptions provided in the federal acts are, however, applicable to this chapter insofar as they are not contrary to this division and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 56.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18695.

If slaughtering or carcass preparation or processing of any meat, meat products, poultry, or poultry product is conducted in an establishment where state inspection is maintained, at hours considered overtime for state employees, or on legal holidays, the owner or operator of the establishment shall, by contract or agreement with the department, make arrangement to defray the additional cost for salaries and expenses for persons employed by the department to conduct the necessary inspection work during the overtime periods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18696.

The director may cooperate with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States in administration of this chapter to effectuate the purposes stated in Sections 18691 and 18692, accept federal assistance for that purpose and spend public funds of this state appropriated for administration of this chapter to pay the state’s proportionate share of the estimated total cost of the cooperative program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18697.

The director may do all of the following:

(a) Recommend to the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States for appointment to the advisory committees provided for in the federal acts, such officials or employees of the department as the director shall designate.

(b) Serve as the representative of the Governor for consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture under the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Inspections and Regulations [18721. - 18738.]

18721.

To accomplish the purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 18691) of this chapter, the director shall require ante mortem and post mortem inspections, quarantine, segregation, and reinspections with respect to the slaughter of any livestock or poultry, or the preparation of any livestock product or poultry product at every establishment in this state, except an establishment which is exempted by him under Section 18811, at which livestock or poultry are slaughtered, or any livestock product or poultry product, is prepared for human food solely for distribution in intrastate commerce.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18722.

The director shall require the identification of livestock and poultry for inspection purposes, and the marking and labeling of any livestock product or poultry product or its containers, or both, as either:

(a) “California Inspected and Passed,” if the product is found upon inspection to be not adulterated.

(b) “California Inspected and Condemned,” if the product is found upon inspection to be adulterated. The destruction for food purposes of any product condemned under this subdivision shall be under the supervision of an inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18723.

The director shall prohibit the entry into official establishments of any livestock product or poultry product which was not prepared under federal inspection or inspection pursuant to this chapter and further limit the entry of any such product or other materials into such establishments under such conditions as he deems neccessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18724.

The director shall require that when any livestock product or poultry product leaves official establishments it shall bear directly thereon or on its containers, or both, as he may require, all information required under Article 5 (commencing with Section 18781) and require approval of all labeling and containers to be used for such product when it is sold or transported in intrastate commerce to assure that the product and the labeling and containers comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18725.

The director shall investigate the sanitary conditions of each establishment required to have inspection under Section 18721 and shall withdraw or otherwise refuse to provide inspection service at any establishment where the sanitary conditions are such as to render adulterated any livestock product or poultry product which is prepared or handled at the establishment. No such establishment shall be operated without inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18726.

The director shall prescribe sanitation requirements for all establishments required to have inspection under Section 18721.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18727.

The director shall require the following classes of persons to keep such records and for such periods as he may specify, to fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in their business, and afford to the director and his representatives, access to such places of business, and opportunity, at all reasonable times, to examine the facilities, inventory and such records, to copy the records, and to take reasonable samples of the inventory:

(a) Any person that engages in intrastate commerce in the business of slaughtering any livestock or poultry, or preparing, freezing, packaging or labeling, buying or selling (as brokers, wholesalers or otherwise), transporting, or storing any livestock product or poultry product which is intended for human or animal food.

(b) Any person that engages in intrastate commerce in the business of rendering or in the buying, selling, or transporting of any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry, or any part of the carcass of any such animal (including poultry) that died otherwise than by slaughter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18728.

The director may refuse to provide inspection service to any establishment that fails to destroy any condemned product as required pursuant to Section 18722 and any regulation promulgated thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18729.

The director may refuse to provide inspection service under this chapter with respect to any establishment for any cause specified in Section 401 of the Federal Meat Inspection Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 671) or Section 18 of the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 467).

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18730.

The director may order any labeling or container to be withheld from use if he determines that the labeling is false or misleading or the container is of a misleading size or form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18731.

The director may prescribe the size and style of any type which is to be used for labeling information required pursuant to this chapter, and definitions and standards of identity or composition or standards of fill of container, consistent with federal standards, when he deems such action appropriate for the protection of the public and after consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18732.

The director may prescribe conditions of storage and handling of any livestock product or poultry product by any person engaged in the business of buying, selling, freezing, storing, or transporting such livestock or poultry product in intrastate commerce to assure that it will not be adulterated or misbranded when delivered to the consumer, including requirements that any vehicle used by any establishment which operates under state inspection for transporting any dressed carcass of any animal, including any poultry, intended for human consumption, any part of any such carcass, meat, meat food product, or poultry product inspected and marked pursuant to this chapter shall be maintained in a clean and sanitary condition and shall be regularly inspected by an inspector stationed at the establishment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18733.

Equines shall be slaughtered and prepared in establishments separate from any establishment where any other livestock is slaughtered or any product of any other livestock is prepared.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18734.

Every person that is engaged in business in intrastate commerce as a broker, renderer, animal food manufacturer, or wholesaler or public warehouseman of any livestock product or poultry product, or engaged in the business of buying, selling, or transporting in intrastate commerce, any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased livestock or poultry or any part of the carcass of any such animal, including any poultry, that died otherwise than by slaughter shall register with the director his name, the address of each place of business, and all trade names under which he conducts such business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18735.

The director may adopt, by reference or otherwise, such provisions of the rules and regulations under the federal acts, with such changes therein as he deems appropriate to make them applicable to operations and transactions subject to this chapter, which shall have the same force and effect as if promulgated under this chapter, and promulgate such other regulations as he deems necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18736.

The director may appoint and prescribe the duties of such inspectors and other personnel as he deems necessary for the efficient execution of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18737.

No inspection of any product placed in any container at any official establishment shall be deemed to be complete until the product is sealed or enclosed in the container under the supervision of an inspector.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18738.

For purposes of any inspection of any product required by this chapter, any inspector authorized by the director shall have access at all times, by day or night, to every part of every establishment required to have inspection under this chapter, whether the establishment is operating or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Adulteration [18751. - 18759.]

18751.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render it injurious to health, but in case the substance is not an added substance, such livestock or poultry product shall not be considered adulterated if the quantity of such substance in or on such article does not ordinarily render it injurious to health.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18752.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated in each of the following cases:

(a) It bears or contains, by reason of administration of any substance to the livestock or poultry or otherwise any added poisonous or added deleterious substance, other than one which is: (1) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw agricultural commodity; (2) a food additive; or (3) a color additive; which may, in the judgment of the director, make such livestock or poultry product unfit for human food.

(b) It is, in whole or in part, a raw agricultural commodity and such commodity bears or contains any pesticide chemical which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 346a). 

(c) It bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 348).

(d) It bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 706 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 376).

A livestock or poultry product which is not otherwise deemed adulterated pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall nevertheless be deemed adulterated if use of the pesticide chemical, food additive, or color additive in, or on, such livestock or poultry product is prohibited by the director in official establishments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18753.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it consists, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance or is for any other reason unsound, unhealthful, unwholesome, or otherwise unfit for human food.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18754.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it has been prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions by which it may have become contaminated with filth, or been rendered injurious to health.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18755.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it is, in whole or in part, the product of an animal, including any poultry, which has died otherwise than by slaughter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18756.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance which may render the contents of the livestock or poultry product injurious to health.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18757.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation was in conformity with a regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to Section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C., Sec. 348).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18758.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated in each of the following cases:

(a) Any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted from the livestock or poultry product.

(b) Any substance has been substituted, wholly or in part, for any valuable constituent.

(c) Damage or inferiority has been concealed in any manner.

(d) Any substance has been added to the livestock or poultry product, or mixed or packed with it, so as to increase its bulk or weight, or reduce its quality or strength, or make it appear of a better value than it is.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18759.

A livestock or poultry product is adulterated if it is margarine containing animal fat and any of the raw material used in it consisted, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Misbranding [18781. - 18789.]

18781.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded in each of the following cases:

(a) Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular.

(b) It is offered for sale under the name of another food.

(c) It is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of uniform size and prominence, the word “imitation” and immediately thereafter, the name of the food imitated.

(d) Its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18782.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded unless it bears a label showing all of the following:

(a) The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor.

(b) An accurate statement of the quantity of the product in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count.

The director may permit reasonable variations, exemptions as to small packages and exemptions as to any livestock product not in a container, that conforms to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18783.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if any word, statement, or other information required by, or under authority of, this chapter to appear on the label or other labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18784.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it purports to be, or is represented, as a food for which a definition and standard of identity or composition has been prescribed by the regulations of the director under Section 18731 unless it conforms to such definition and standard, and its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard and, insofar as may be required by such regulations, the common names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavoring, and coloring, present in such food.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18785.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it purports to be, or is represented as, a food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by regulations of the director under this chapter, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in such manner and form as such regulations specify, a statement that it falls below such standard.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18786.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it is not subject to the provisions of Section 18784, unless its label bears the common or usual name of the food, if any, and in case it consists of two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each such ingredient. The director may, however, permit spices, flavorings, and colorings to be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings without naming each, and to the extent that compliance with the requirements of Section 18784 are impracticable, or results in deception or unfair competition, by granting exemptions that conform to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18787.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it purports to be, or is represented to be, for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as the director, after consultation with the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States, determines is necessary to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18788.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it is so indicated on the label. To the extent that compliance with the requirements of this section is impracticable, the director may establish exemptions that conform to the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18789.

A livestock or poultry product is misbranded if it fails to bear, directly upon the livestock or poultry product and on its container, as the director may prescribe, the official inspection legend and establishment number of the establishment where the product was prepared. The director may require such other information as he deems necessary to assure that the product will not have false or misleading labeling and that the public will be informed of the manner of handling required to maintain the livestock or poultry product in a wholesome condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exemptions [18811. - 18814.]

18811.

For the purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 18691) of this chapter, the director may exempt the operations of any person from inspection or other requirements of this chapter to the extent such operations would be exempt from the corresponding requirements under the Federal Meat Inspection Act or the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act if they were conducted in interstate commerce or if the state were designated as one in which the federal requirements apply to intrastate commerce by the federal acts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18812.

The director shall exempt from inspection the slaughtering and preparation by any person of any livestock or poultry of his own raising, exclusively for use by him, members of his household, his nonpaying guests, or employees, and may exempt any other operation which the director determines would best be exempted to further the purposes of this chapter, to the extent such exemption conforms to the Federal Meat Inspection Act and the Federal Poultry Products Inspection Act and the regulations thereunder.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18813.

The director shall not provide inspection under this chapter at any establishment for the slaughter of livestock or poultry or the preparation of any livestock product or poultry product that is not intended for use as human food. The product, unless naturally inedible by humans, shall be denatured or otherwise identified as prescribed by the director, prior to being offered for sale or transportation in intrastate commerce, to prevent its use as human food, and shall be in compliance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19200) of this part and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 113025) of Part 6 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 57.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18814.

(a) This chapter shall apply to a retail store only to the same extent as the federal acts and regulations issued thereunder are applicable to retail stores, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) No livestock product or poultry product shall be prepared at any such retail store by curing, drying, smoking, or rendering, nor any livestock product of swine by cooking.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [18841. - 18857.]

18841.

It is unlawful for any person to slaughter any livestock or poultry, or prepare any livestock or poultry product which is capable of use as human food, at any establishment preparing such article solely for intrastate commerce, except in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18842.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, any article required to be inspected under this chapter, unless such article has been inspected and passed, or any livestock, poultry, livestock product, or poultry product which is capable of use as human food, which is adulterated or misbranded at the time of such sale, transportation, offer for sale or transportation, or receipt for transportation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18843.

It is unlawful for any person to do, with respect to any livestock, poultry, livestock product, or poultry product which is capable of use as human food, any act while it is being transported in intrastate commerce or held for sale after such transportation, which is intended to cause, or has the effect of causing, it to be adulterated or misbranded.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18844.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, transport, offer for sale or transportation, or receive for transportation, in intrastate commerce, or from an official establishment, any slaughtered poultry from which the blood, feathers, feet, head, or viscera have not been removed in accordance with this chapter and regulations promulgated under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18845.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any provision of the regulations promulgated by the director under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18846.

It is unlawful for any brand manufacturer, printer, or other person to cast, print, lithograph, or otherwise make any device containing any official mark or simulation thereof, or any label bearing any such mark or simulation, or any form of official certificate or simulation thereof, except as authorized by the director under such conditions as he may prescribe to assure the accomplishments of the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

18847.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Forge any official device, mark, or certificate.

(b) Without authorization from the director to use any official device, mark, or certificate, or simulation thereof, or alter, detach, deface, or destroy any official device, mark, or certificate.
